src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-h37_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: evangelii
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: evangelii
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: evangelii
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: evangeliis
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [evangelii, evangeliir]
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [evangelii, evangeliir]
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: evangelium
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: evangelia
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: evangeliið
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: evangeliið
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: evangeliinum
    evangelii+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: evangeliisins
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: evangeliini
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: evangeliini
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: evangeliunum
    evangelii+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: evangelianna
